Arkansas, session 2025, SB632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 56, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-56-224. Labeling of hair relaxers — Legislative findings —
Definitions.
(a) The General Assembly finds that certain chemicals used in hair
relaxers are linked to harmful impacts on health, such as cancer, birth
defects, damage to the reproductive system, organ system toxicity, and
endocrine disruption.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) Carcinogen" means any chemical identified as:
(A) A "Group 1 carcinogen" or "Group 2A carcinogen" by the
World Health Organization or International Agency for Research on Cancer;
(B) A "known to be a human carcinogen" and "reasonably
anticipated to be a human carcinogen" by the Secretary of the United States
Department of Health and Human Services under the Public Health Service Act,
*JMB261*
04/07/2025 8:11:01 AM JMB261

SB632
42 U.S.C. § 241(b)(4), existing on January 1, 2025; and
(C) "Group A carcinogens" or "Group B carcinogens" by the
United States Environmental Protection Agency;
(2) “Hair relaxer” means any product topically applied to hair
for the purpose of weakening the structure and curliness of the hair fiber
and allowing for a straightening of the hair; and
(3) "Reproductive toxicant" means any chemical identified as a
reproductive or a developmental toxicant by the United States Department of
Health and Human Services, National Toxicology Program, Center for the
Evaluation of Risks to Human Reproduction.
(c)(1) A hair relaxer being offered for sale in this state that
contains a carcinogen or a reproductive toxicant shall provide a clear and
conspicuous warning label displayed on the packaging or product itself, which
shall be printed in type no less than size twelve-point font, that notifies
the consumer at the time of the sale that the hair relaxer contains a
carcinogen or reproductive toxicant.
(2) The warning label shall state:
(A) If a product contains a carcinogen: "This product
contains a chemical known to cause cancer";
(B) If a product contains a reproductive toxicant: "This
product contains a chemical known to cause birth defects or other
reproductive harm"; or
(C) If a product contains both a carcinogen and a
reproductive toxicant: "This product contains chemicals known to cause cancer
and birth defects or other reproductive harm".











04/07/2025 8:11:01 AM JMB261